Illinois, session 104th, SB436.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (115 ILCS 5/20)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1720)7    Sec. 20. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the "Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-1014.)